Hawaii, session 2025, GM1173.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF HAWAII:
SECTION 1. The legislature finds that the department of
health's responsibility to protect both public and environmental
health is essential, especially as climate change increases
pressures on resources and communities. The recognition that
the health of a community is closely tied to environmental
conditions underscores the importance of preventing threats to
the environment. Therefore, it is critical that the department
of health has the clear legal authority and mandate to act not
only in response to direct threats of disease but also when
nuisances pose a risk to the public or environmental health of a
community.
Accordingly, the purpose of this Act is to clarify the
legal authority of the department of health to prevent and
address nuisances that threaten public or environmental health,
both of which affect the overall health and well-being of the
people of the State as a whole.
2025-2537 HB1120 SD2 SMA.docx 1

Page 2 H.B. NO 1120
H.D. 2
S.D. 2
SECTION 2. Chapter 322, Hawaii Revised Statutes, is
amended by amending the title of part I to read as follows:
"PART I. PREVENTION AND ABATEMENT OF NUISANCES"
SECTION 3. Section 322-1, Hawaii Revised Statutes, is
amended to read as follows:
"§322-1 [Removal>—prevention.] Prevention; abatement;
destruction; removal. The department of health and its agents
shall examine into all nuisances, such as foul or noxious odors,
gases or vapors, water in which mosquito larvae exist, sources
of filth, and all causes of sickness or disease, on shore, and
in any vessel, which may be known to them or brought to their
attention, [whieh] that in their opinion are dangerous or
injurious to public health or environmental health, or both, and
into any and all conditions created or existing [which] that
cause or tend [to gquoc siokneoo or di-ocaao or] to be dangerous
or injurious to public health or environmental health, or both,
and shall [cauoo the oamo to be- abated,—dootroycd,—removed,—©r
prevenfeed-r
For purpoooo of thio part-—a nuioance shall include :■
4i-)- Texie—mafeeiirais—that—are—used-in—©3?-tey—pa?©€kiefes—of—the
manufacture or oonvoroion of—methamphetamine,—and
2025-2537 HB1120 SD2 SMA.docx 2

Page 3 H.B. NO.
clandeotino dj?ug labs -that manu-f-aefeu-re
methamphotaminG;—afid
-{-24- Qdor-o—and-£-i-l-th r-eoulting from a poraon feeding- feral
birdo.]
prevent, abate, destroy, or remove the nuisance or condition
that causes a nuisance."
SECTION 4. Statutory material to be repealed is bracketed
and stricken. New statutory material is underscored.
SECTION 5. This Act shall take effect upon its approval.
2025-2537 HB1120 SD2 SMA.docx 3
iHMBiiiiiiiiiiiiiiiniiiniii

H.B. NO. 1120
H.D. 2
S.D. 2
APPROVED this 19th day of May . 2025
GOVERNOR OF THE STATE OF HAWAII

HB No. 1120, HD 2, SD 2
THE HOUSE OF REPRESENTATIVES OF THE STATE OF HAWAII
Date: April 21, 2025
Honolulu, Hawaii
We hereby certify that the above-referenced Bill on this day passed Final Reading in the
House of Representatives of the Thirty-Third Legislature of the State of Hawaii, Regular Session
of2025.
Nadine K. Nakamura
Speaker
House of Representatives
Brian L. Takeshita
Chief Clerk
House of Representatives

H.B.No. 1120,H.D. 2, S.D. 2
THE SENATE OF THE STATE OF HAW API
Date; April 8, 2025
Honolulu, HawaiT 96813
We hereby certify that the foregoing Bill this day passed Third Reading in the Senate
of the Thirty-Third Legislature of the State of Hawai‘i, Regular Session of 2025.
Clerk of the Senate
1664